Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.150

Continuing political committee. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Continuing political committee" means a political committee that is an organization of continuing existence not limited to participation in any particular election campaign or election cycle.

[ 2024 c 164 s 215.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.